District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.105

Actions to be in name of District of Columbia; “Corporation Counsel” defined; adjudication of civil infractions.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 305, Pub. L. 87-569, § 105
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 431(d), 32 DCR 4450
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-301.105.
1981 Ed., § 29-599.7.
1973 Ed., § 29-1099f.